District of Columbia statutes.
48-903.09

Civil infractions.

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this subchapter, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this subchapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this subchapter shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, title III, § 309
as added Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-237, § 6, 38 DCR 314

History

Authorization or approval of interception of wire or oral communications, see § 23-546.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 33-539.

Prior Codifications